Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.140

Operating procedures.

The secretary of state may publish recommended procedures for the operation of the various vote tallying systems that have been approved. These procedures allow the office of the secretary of state to restrict or define the use of approved systems in elections.

[ 2003 c 111 s 314. Prior: 1998 c 58 s 3; 1990 c 59 s 34; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 75; 1967 ex.s. c 109 s 32. Formerly RCW 29.33.360, 29.34.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.